Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 8 Packaging, Labeling and Advertising of Honey

§ 11-8-101.
Definition of honey; improper labeling prohibited.

“Honey” means the nectar and saccharine exudation of plants, gathered, modified and stored in the comb by honey bees, which is levorotatory, containing not more than twenty-five percent (25%) water, not more than twenty-five hundredths percent (.25%) ash, and not more than eight percent (8%) sucrose.

It is unlawful to sell or offer for sale any product which resembles honey and which is labeled, advertised or otherwise represented to be honey, if it is not honey. The word “imitation” shall not be used in the name of a product which resembles honey whether or not it contains any honey. The label for a product which does not resemble honey but which contains honey may include the word “honey” in the name of the product, and the relative position of the word “honey” in the product name, and in the list of ingredients when required, shall be determined by its prominence as an ingredient in the product.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 3, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-121.1, 11-121.2; W.S. 1977, §§

11-8-101

,

11-8-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-8-102.
Penalty.

A violation of W.S.

11-8-101

is a misdemeanor, and any person convicted thereof shall
be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), imprisoned in
the county jail not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 3, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-121.3; W.S. 1977, § 11-8-103; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.